Massachusetts, session 194th, S2420.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following in alphabetical order to the list of 
definitions: 
“Truck-trailer unit”, a motor unit composed of a motor vehicle designed to carry a load 
and having a minimum of three axles, such as a dump truck, log truck, or other truck, paired with 
a trailer having a minimum of two axles. 
SECTION 2. Section 30A of Chapter 85 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 
official edition, is hereby amended by replacing “motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer or semi-
trailer unit” with “motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, semi-trailer unit, or truck-trailer unit” in 
each instance of this section.